Nebraska, session 109, LB256.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
Section 1. MIDWEST INTERSTATE PASSENGER RAIL COMPACT
The contracting states solemnly agree:
ARTICLE I
STATEMENT OF PURPOSE
The purposes of this compact are, through joint or cooperative
action:
(1) To promote development and implementation of improvements to
intercity passenger rail service in the Midwest;
(2) To coordinate interaction among Midwestern state elected
officials and their designees on passenger rail issues;
(3) To promote development and implementation of long-range plans
for high-speed rail passenger service in the Midwest and among other
regions of the United States;
(4) To work with the public and private sectors at the federal,
state, and local levels to ensure coordination among the various entities
having an interest in passenger rail service and to promote Midwestern
interests regarding passenger rail; and
(5) To support efforts of transportation agencies involved in
developing and implementing passenger rail service in the Midwest.
ARTICLE II
ESTABLISHMENT OF COMMISSION
To further the purposes of the compact, a commission is created to
carry out the duties specified in this compact.
ARTICLE III
COMMISSION MEMBERSHIP
The manner of appointment of commission members, terms of office
consistent with the terms of this compact, provisions for removal and
suspension, and manner of appointment to fill vacancies shall be
determined by each party state pursuant to its laws, but each
commissioner shall be a resident of the state of appointment. Commission
members shall serve without compensation from the commission. The
-2-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
commission shall consist of four resident members of each state as
follows: The Governor or the Governor’s designee who shall serve during
the tenure of office of the Governor, or until a successor is named; one
member of the private sector who shall be appointed by the Governor and
shall serve during the tenure of office of the Governor, or until a
successor is named; and two legislators, one from each legislative
chamber (or two legislators from any unicameral legislature), who shall
serve two-year terms, or until successors are appointed, and who shall be
appointed by the appropriate appointing authority in each legislative
chamber (or unicameral legislature). All vacancies shall be filled in
accordance with the laws of the appointing states. Any commissioner
appointed to fill a vacancy shall serve until the end of the incomplete
term. Each member state shall have equal voting privileges, as determined
by the commission bylaws.
ARTICLE IV
POWERS AND DUTIES OF THE COMMISSION
The duties of the commission are to:
(1) Advocate for the funding and authorization necessary to make
passenger rail improvements a reality for the region;
(2) Identify and seek to develop ways that states can form
partnerships, including with rail industry and labor, to implement
improved passenger rail in the region;
(3) Seek development of a long-term, interstate plan for high-speed
rail passenger service implementation;
(4) Cooperate with other agencies, regions, and entities to ensure
that the Midwest is adequately represented and integrated into national
plans for passenger rail development;
(5) Adopt bylaws governing the activities and procedures of the
commission and addressing, among other subjects: Powers and duties of
officers, voting rights of commission members, voting procedures,
commission business, and any other purposes necessary to fulfill the
-3-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
duties of the commission;
(6) Expend such funds as required to carry out the powers and duties
of the commission; and
(7) Report on the activities of the commission to the legislatures
and Governor of the member states on an annual basis.
In addition to its exercise of these duties, the commission is
empowered to:
(1) Provide multistate advocacy necessary to implement passenger
rail systems or plans, as approved by the commission;
(2) Work with local elected officials, economic development planning
organizations, and similar entities to raise the visibility of passenger
rail service benefits and needs;
(3) Educate other state officials, federal agencies, other elected
officials and the public on the advantages of passenger rail as an
integral part of an intermodal transportation system in the region;
(4) Work with federal agency officials and members of Congress to
ensure the funding and authorization necessary to develop a long-term,
interstate plan for high-speed rail passenger service implementation;
(5) Make recommendations to member states;
(6) If requested by each state participating in a particular project
and under the terms of a formal agreement approved by the participating
states and the commission, implement or provide oversight for specific
rail projects;
(7) Establish an office and hire staff as necessary;
(8) Contract for or provide services;
(9) Assess dues, in accordance with the terms of this compact;
(10) Conduct research; and
(11) Establish committees.
ARTICLE V
OFFICERS
The commission shall annually elect from among its members a
-4-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
chairperson, a vice-chairperson who shall not be a resident of the state
represented by the chairperson, and others as approved in the commission
bylaws. The officers shall perform such functions and exercise such
powers as are specified in the commission bylaws.
ARTICLE VI
MEETINGS AND COMMISSION ADMINISTRATION
The commission shall meet at least once in each calendar year, and
at such other times as may be determined by the commission. Commission
business shall be conducted in accordance with the procedures and voting
rights specified in the bylaws.
ARTICLE VII
FINANCE
Except as otherwise provided for, the monies necessary to finance
the general operations of the commission in carrying forth its duties,
responsibilities, and powers as stated herein shall be appropriated to
the commission by the compacting states, when authorized by the
respective legislatures, by equal apportionment among the compacting
states. Nothing in this compact shall be construed to commit a member
state to participate in financing a rail project except as provided by
law of a member state.
The commission may accept, for any of its purposes and functions,
donations, gifts, grants, and appropriations of money, equipment,
supplies, materials, and services from the federal government, from any
party state or from any department, agency, or municipality thereof, or
from any institution, person, firm, or corporation. All expenses incurred
by the commission in executing the duties imposed upon it by this compact
shall be paid by the commission out of the funds available to it. The
commission shall not issue any debt instrument. The commission shall
submit to the officer designated by the laws of each party state,
periodically as required by the laws of each party state, a budget of its
actual past, and estimated future expenditures.
-5-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
ARTICLE VIII
ENACTMENT, EFFECTIVE DATE, AND AMENDMENTS
The states of Illinois, Indiana, Iowa, Kansas, Michigan, Minnesota,
Missouri, Nebraska, North Dakota, Ohio, South Dakota, and Wisconsin are
eligible to join this compact. Upon approval of the commission, according
to its bylaws, other states may also be declared eligible to join the
compact. As to any eligible party state, this compact shall become
effective when its legislature shall have enacted the same into law;
provided that it shall not become initially effective until enacted into
law by any three party states incorporating the provisions of this
compact into the laws of such states. Amendments to the compact shall
become effective upon their enactment by the legislatures of all
compacting states.
ARTICLE IX
WITHDRAWAL, DEFAULT, AND TERMINATION
Withdrawal from this compact shall be by enactment of a statute
repealing the same and shall take effect one year after the effective
date of such statute. A withdrawing state shall be liable for any
obligations which it may have incurred prior to the effective date of
withdrawal.
If any compacting state shall at any time default in the performance
of any of its obligations, assumed or imposed, in accordance with the
provisions of this compact, all rights, privileges, and benefits
conferred by this compact or agreements hereunder shall be suspended from
the effective date of such default as fixed by the commission, and the
commission shall stipulate the conditions and maximum time for compliance
under which the defaulting state may resume its regular status. Unless
such default shall be remedied under the stipulations and within the time
period set forth by the commission, this compact may be terminated with
respect to such defaulting state by affirmative vote of a majority of the
other commission members. Any such defaulting state may be reinstated,
-6-

LB256 LB256
2025 2025
upon vote of the commission, by performing all acts and obligations as
stipulated by the commission.
ARTICLE X
CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY
The provisions of this compact entered into hereunder shall be
severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence, or provision of this
compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any compacting
state or of the United States or the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance is held invalid, the validity
of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any
government, agency, person, or circumstance shall not be affected hereby.
If this compact entered into hereunder shall be held contrary to the
constitution of any compacting state, the compact shall remain in full
force and effect as to the remaining states and in full force and effect
as to the state affected as to all severable matters. The provisions of
this compact entered into pursuant hereto shall be liberally construed to
effectuate the purposes thereof.
Sec. 2. The State of Nebraska shall not participate in any rail
project or appropriate money for any rail project proposed by the Midwest
Interstate Passenger Rail Compact unless the specific project is
authorized by the enactment of a legislative bill. For purposes of this
section, rail project includes the planning phase of such a project.
Sec. 3. The Midwest Interstate Passenger Rail Compact Cash Fund is
created and shall consist of gifts, grants, or bequests from any source,
including federal, state, public, and private sources, and may consist of
money transferred by the Legislature. The money shall be used to carry
out passenger rail initiatives under the Midwest Interstate Passenger
Rail Compact. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be
invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
-7-